New York, session 2025-2026, A2121.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Democracy 2 During Detention Act". 3 § 2. The election law is amended by adding a new section 8-109 to read 4 as follows: 5 § 8-109. Polling places at correctional facilities and local correc- 6 tional facilities. 1. For purposes of facilitating voting by incarcerat- 7 ed individuals at correctional facilities and local correctional facili- 8 ties, as such terms are defined in section two of the correction law, 9 the board of elections of each county may establish by majority vote, in 10 lieu of the absentee balloting program set forth in section 8-415 of 11 this article, a polling place at any such facility for at least three 12 hours of operation beginning the tenth day prior to any general, prima- 13 ry, run-off primary pursuant to subdivision one of section 6-162 of this 14 chapter or special election for any public or party position, and 15 ending on and including the ninth day prior to such general, primary, 16 run-off primary or special election for such public office or party EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00107-05-6 A. 2121--A 2 1 position. Any such polling place shall be established in compliance 2 with the early voting provisions of paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivi- 3 sion four and subdivisions five through eleven of section 8-600 of this 4 article, section 8-604 of this article regarding registration during 5 early voting, and subdivision one-a of section 4-104 of this chapter. 6 Voter access to polling places established pursuant to this section 7 shall be restricted to voters incarcerated at such facility or related 8 facilities and voters who are employees of such facilities, who are 9 registered to vote in the county where such facility is located. All 10 other eligible voters who are incarcerated at such facility or who are 11 employees of such facility shall be provided with voter registration 12 forms and absentee ballot applications pursuant to section 8-415 of this 13 article. The establishment of polling places under this section shall 14 be in addition to, and shall not diminish, the minimum quantity of early 15 voting locations required by subdivision two of section 8-600 of this 16 article, nor shall the fact of such establishment alter or prejudice the 17 application of the equitable siting factors therein. 18 2. (a) For purposes of facilitating voting by incarcerated individuals 19 at correctional facilities and local correctional facilities, as such 20 terms are defined in section two of the correction law, the board of 21 elections in the city of New York may establish by majority vote, in 22 lieu of the absentee balloting program set forth in section 8-415 of 23 this article, a polling place at any such facility for at least six 24 hours of operation beginning the tenth day prior to any general, prima- 25 ry, run-off primary pursuant to subdivision one of section 6-162 of this 26 chapter or special election for any public or party position, and ending 27 on and including the eighth day prior to such general, primary, run-off 28 primary or special election for such public office or party position. 29 Any such polling place shall be established in compliance with the 30 provisions of paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision four and subdivi- 31 sions five through eleven of section 8-600 of this article, section 32 8-604 of this article, and subdivision one-a of section 4-104 of this 33 chapter. Voter access to polling places established pursuant to this 34 section shall be restricted to voters incarcerated at such facility or 35 related facilities and voters who are employees of such facilities, who 36 are registered to vote in the county where such facility is located. All 37 other eligible voters who are incarcerated at such facility or who are 38 employees of such facility shall be provided with voter registration 39 forms and offered absentee ballot applications pursuant to section 8-415 40 of this article. The establishment of polling places under this section 41 shall be in addition to, and shall not diminish, the minimum quantity of 42 early voting locations required by subdivision two of section 8-600 of 43 this article, nor shall the fact of such establishment alter or preju- 44 dice the application of the equitable siting factors therein. 45 (b) Without limiting the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 46 sion, the board of elections in the city of New York, in performing its 47 obligations under paragraph (a) of this subdivision, shall conduct at 48 least one site visit between forty-five and thirty days prior to a 49 primary or general election to administer timely voter registration by 50 eligible citizens at each correctional or local correctional facility 51 for which a polling place will be established pursuant to paragraph (a) 52 of this subdivision using board of elections electronic tablets and 53 digital resources wherever possible to effectuate electronic voter 54 registration in accordance with section 5-802 of this title, resorting 55 to paper forms only in extenuating circumstances or where employing such 56 tablets and digital resources would be impracticable. A. 2121--A 3 1 3. Prior to the establishment of a polling place pursuant to subdivi- 2 sion one or two of this section, the board of elections shall develop a 3 facility voter access plan in consultation and cooperation with and 4 countersigned by the facility's superintendent, administrator or direc- 5 tor, or their designated democracy officer or agent. Such plan shall 6 describe the dates, times, and location or locations where registration 7 and voting will take place; the proposed staffing levels; election 8 equipment, materials, and voting machines to be deployed; how detained 9 citizens will be informed of voter eligibility; the technology, elec- 10 tricity, and cybersecurity needed to effectuate the plan; and voting 11 procedures, security measures and other considerations relevant to 12 ensuring secure and accessible voter access for eligible voters located 13 at the facility. Such plan shall be submitted to the state board of 14 elections no later than ninety days prior to the first day of voting and 15 approved by the state board of elections with any amendments prescribed 16 by the state board of elections no later than seventy-five days prior to 17 the first day of voting and shall be a public record. 18 § 3. The election law is amended by adding a new section 8-415 to read 19 as follows: 20 § 8-415. Absentee voting; application and registration drive for 21 incarcerated individuals at correctional facilities and local correc- 22 tional facilities. 1. This section applies to any correctional facility 23 or local correctional facility, as such terms are defined in section two 24 of the correction law, except for any such facility where the incarcer- 25 ated individuals at such facility are exclusively under the age of eigh- 26 teen. 27 2. (a) The board of elections in counties with at least one hundred 28 thousand registered voters shall provide that the eligible incarcerated 29 individuals at any such facility in such county with seventy-five or 30 more incarcerated individuals may vote by absentee ballot as provided 31 for in this section. 32 (b) Each board of elections subject to paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 33 sion shall develop a facility voter access plan in consultation and 34 cooperation with and countersigned by the facility's superintendent, 35 administrator or director, or their designated democracy officer or 36 agent. Such plan shall include written procedures to ensure orderly 37 administration of the absentee balloting program at each such facility, 38 in a manner such that all eligible persons have an effective opportunity 39 to register and vote. Such procedures shall include the delivery and 40 retrieval of electronic or paper voter registration forms, ballot 41 requests, and absentee ballots; describe the dates, times, and location 42 or locations where registration and voting will take place; the proposed 43 staffing levels; election equipment, materials, and any voting machines 44 to be deployed; how incarcerated individuals will be informed of voter 45 eligibility; the technology, electricity, and cybersecurity needed to 46 effectuate the plan; and procedures, security measures and other consid- 47 erations relevant to ensuring secure and accessible voting at the facil- 48 ity. This plan shall be submitted to the state board of elections no 49 later than ninety days prior to the first election day in which such 50 facility will participate in this program, and approved by the state 51 board of elections with any amendments prescribed by the state board of 52 elections no later than seventy-five days prior to such election day, 53 and shall be a public record. This paragraph shall not apply to facili- 54 ties where a board of elections establishes a polling place in accord- 55 ance with section 8-109 of this article. A. 2121--A 4 1 (c) Without limiting the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 2 sion, the board of elections in the city of New York, in performing its 3 obligations under paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall: 4 (i) ensure the adequate resource allocation and deployment, in a 5 manner consistent with that provided to voters who are not incarcerated, 6 of assistive devices and reasonable accommodations for persons with 7 disabilities pursuant to section 4-104 of this chapter, and interpretive 8 resources and language-related assistance in voting and elections pursu- 9 ant to section 17-208 of this chapter and in coordination with the poll 10 site language assistance program prescribed by paragraph (a) of subdivi- 11 sion four of section thirty-two hundred two of the charter of the city 12 of New York, to the extent justified by the needs of the voters incar- 13 cerated; 14 (ii) conduct at least one site visit between thirty and forty-five 15 days prior to a primary or general election to administer timely voter 16 registration and absentee ballot application by eligible citizens at 17 each such facility in accordance with subdivision three of this section 18 using board of elections electronic tablets and digital resources wher- 19 ever possible to effectuate electronic voter registration in accordance 20 with section 5-802 of this chapter and electronic absentee ballot appli- 21 cation in accordance with section 8-408 of this title, resorting to 22 paper forms only in extenuating circumstances or where employing such 23 tablets and digital resources would be impracticable, provided however, 24 that the board of elections in the city of New York may dispense with 25 such site visit if the approved written procedures for voting at such 26 facility required by paragraph (a) of this subdivision expressly author- 27 ize and direct the board of inspectors attending such facility to 28 conduct and process same-day voter registration and to receive and proc- 29 ess same-day in-person absentee ballot applications, including, for 30 applicants that are determined to be entitled to vote, delivery of the 31 applicable ballots; and 32 (iii) allocate and deploy sufficient equipment, personnel, and 33 resources when attending correctional facilities and local correctional 34 facilities within its jurisdiction at levels that, in consultation with 35 the state board of elections, take into account the estimated number of 36 eligible voters, historical data regarding the time taken to check in 37 and process voters at an office of the board of elections or a polling 38 place, public safety and security considerations, the division of incar- 39 cerated individuals among buildings, and other relevant factors. 40 3. For all other correctional facilities and local correctional facil- 41 ities, the board of elections shall coordinate with the superintendent, 42 administrator, director, designated democracy officer or agent to facil- 43 itate voter access by ensuring that all eligible citizens are provided 44 with access to electronic personal voter registration pursuant to this 45 article or voter registration by application which shall be processed 46 pursuant to sections 5-208 and 5-210 of this chapter, as applicable, 47 and, except for county voters detained or confined at a correctional 48 facility or local correctional facility at which a polling place will be 49 established pursuant to section 8-109 of this article, that all eligible 50 voters are provided with an absentee ballot application no later than 51 twenty-one days prior to election day. It shall be the duty of each such 52 superintendent, administrator, director, designated democracy officer or 53 agent to assist the board in the discharge of its duties pursuant to 54 this subdivision, including, but not limited to making available suit- 55 able space and reasonable accommodations within such facility. A. 2121--A 5 1 4. The state board of elections shall promulgate non-partisan educa- 2 tional materials in plain language about the voting rights of individ- 3 uals currently incarcerated and formerly incarcerated for inclusion in 4 the incarcerated individual handbook or similar materials and reentry 5 resources. 6 5. Without limiting the provisions of subdivisions three and four of 7 this section, the board of elections in the city of New York, in 8 performing its obligations under subdivision three of this section, 9 shall deploy interpretive resources and language-related assistance to 10 ensure all eligible individuals have an effective opportunity to regis- 11 ter to vote and apply for an absentee ballot, to the extent justified by 12 the needs of the voters actually incarcerated. 13 6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the rights 14 under state and federal law of any voter pursuant to this section and 15 the rights and remedies provided for under title two of article seven- 16 teen of this chapter. 17 § 4. Subdivision 1 of section 17-208 of the election law, as added by 18 chapter 226 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 19 1. Political subdivisions required to provide language assistance. A 20 board of elections or a political subdivision that administers elections 21 shall provide language-related assistance in voting and elections to a 22 language-minority group in a political subdivision, or to citizens 23 belonging to a language-minority group incarcerated at correctional 24 facilities or local correctional facilities, if, based on data from the 25 American community survey, or data of comparable quality collected by a 26 public office, such data indicates that: 27 (a) more than two percent, but in no instance fewer than three hundred 28 individuals, of the citizens of voting age of a political subdivision, 29 or in the city of New York the citizens of voting age incarcerated at 30 correctional facilities or local correctional facilities, are members of 31 a single language-minority group and are limited English proficient. 32 (b) more than four thousand of the citizens of voting age of such 33 political subdivision are members of a single language-minority group 34 and are limited English proficient. 35 (c) in the case of a political subdivision that contains all or any 36 part of a Native American reservation, more than two percent of the 37 Native American citizens of voting age within the Native American reser- 38 vation are members of a single language-minority group and are limited 39 English proficient. For the purposes of this paragraph, "Native Ameri- 40 can" is defined to include any persons recognized by the United States 41 census bureau or New York as "American Indian" or "Alaska Native". 42 § 5. Section 75 of the correction law, as amended by chapter 103 of 43 the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 44 § 75. [Notice of voting] Voting rights. 1. Freedom to vote. All 45 persons who have been or hereafter be incarcerated at any correctional 46 facility, who are qualified to register for and vote at any election 47 pursuant to section 5-102 of the election law and not subject to exclu- 48 sion by section 5-106 of the election law, are hereby declared to be 49 entitled to the free exercise and enjoyment of the elective franchise 50 without discrimination or preference. 51 2. Opportunity to register to vote and request ballots. The rules and 52 regulations established for any correctional facility shall recognize 53 the right of incarcerated individuals, who are qualified to register for 54 and vote at any election pursuant to section 5-102 of the election law 55 and not subject to exclusion by section 5-106 of the election law, to 56 the free exercise of their right to vote in accordance with the A. 2121--A 6 1 provisions of the constitution and, to effectuate such end, shall allow 2 for access by the eligible individuals to electronic personal voter 3 registration or voter registration by application pursuant to article 4 five of the election law and to access absentee balloting services 5 through the electronic absentee ballot application transmittal system or 6 by paper application pursuant to title four of article eight of the 7 election law, in such manner as may best carry into effect the intent of 8 this section and be consistent with the proper discipline and management 9 of the correctional facility. Such services shall be made available 10 within the buildings or grounds, whenever possible, where the incarcer- 11 ated individuals are confined, in such manner and at such hours as will 12 be in accordance with the rules and regulations of both the facility and 13 the board of elections, and such facilities shall secure to such indi- 14 viduals the free exercise of their right to vote in accordance with the 15 provisions of this section. In case of a violation of any of the 16 provisions of this section, any person aggrieved thereby may exercise 17 any rights and remedies provided for under state and federal law, 18 including by instituting proceedings in the supreme court of the 19 district where such facility is situated, which is hereby authorized and 20 empowered to enforce the provisions of this section. 21 3. Duty to cooperate. Pursuant to sections 8-109, if applicable, 22 8-406, 8-415, and 17-208 of the election law, the superintendent of each 23 correctional facility shall cooperate with the board of elections in 24 developing and implementing a plan to facilitate at least one method of 25 voter access for all persons eligible to vote who are incarcerated at 26 each such facility. The superintendent of each correctional facility 27 shall provide timely clearance of board of elections personnel appointed 28 by the board of elections to discharge their duties under sections 8-407 29 and 8-415 of the election law, authorize access for such personnel, and 30 provide security for board of elections personnel. The superintendent 31 of each correctional facility shall ensure that such personnel shall be 32 provided with the necessary resources, space and reasonable accommo- 33 dations within such facility for the discharge of its duties. The 34 department shall issue regulations directing each such facility to 35 ensure the timely delivery, and to facilitate the timely return if 36 applicable, of all official election mail, forms, notices or communi- 37 cations to any incarcerated individual at such facility and that non- 38 partisan plain language educational materials about the voting rights of 39 individuals currently incarcerated and formerly incarcerated are 40 included in the incarcerated individual handbook or similar materials 41 and reentry resources. Without limiting any rights or remedies provided 42 to voters under the law, there shall be a presumption of a violation of 43 subdivision one of section 17-212 of the election law when any super- 44 intendent, employee, or agent of such correctional facility, by commis- 45 sion or omission, intentionally frustrates the purposes of this section. 46 4. Rights restoration upon release and registration. Prior to the 47 release from a correctional facility of any person the department shall 48 notify such person verbally and in writing, that [his or her] such 49 voting rights will be restored upon release and provide such person with 50 a form of application for voter registration and a declination form, 51 offer such person assistance in filling out the appropriate form, and 52 provide such person written information distributed by the board of 53 elections on the importance and the mechanics of voting. Upon release, 54 such person may choose to either submit [his or her] such completed 55 application to the state board or county board where such person resides 56 or have the department transmit it on [his or her] such person's behalf. A. 2121--A 7 1 Where such person chooses to have the department transmit the applica- 2 tion, the department shall transmit the completed application upon such 3 person's release to the state board or county board where such person 4 resides. 5 § 6. Section 510 of the correction law, as amended by chapter 473 of 6 the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 7 § 510. Voting [upon release]. 1. Freedom to vote. All persons who have 8 been or hereafter are incarcerated at any local correctional facility, 9 who are qualified to register for and vote at any election pursuant to 10 section 5-102 of the election law and not subject to exclusion by 11 section 5-106 of the election law, are hereby declared to be entitled to 12 the free exercise and enjoyment of the elective franchise without 13 discrimination or preference. 14 2. Opportunity to register to vote and request ballots. The rules and 15 regulations established for local correctional facilities shall recog- 16 nize the right of incarcerated individuals, who are qualified to regis- 17 ter for and vote at any election pursuant to section 5-102 of the 18 election law and not subject to exclusion by section 5-106 of the 19 election law, to the free exercise of their right to vote in accordance 20 with the provisions of the constitution and, to effectuate such end, 21 shall allow for access by the eligible individuals to electronic 22 personal voter registration or voter registration by application pursu- 23 ant to article five of the election law and to access absentee balloting 24 services through the electronic absentee ballot application transmittal 25 system or by paper application pursuant to title four of article eight 26 of the election law, in such manner as may best carry into effect the 27 intent of this section and be consistent with the proper discipline and 28 management of the correctional facility. Such services shall be made 29 available within the buildings or grounds, whenever possible, where the 30 incarcerated individuals are confined, in such manner and at such hours 31 as will be in accordance with the rules and regulations of both the 32 facility and the board of elections, and secure to such individuals the 33 free exercise of their right to vote in accordance with the provisions 34 of this section. In case of a violation of any of the provisions of this 35 section, any person aggrieved thereby may exercise any rights and reme- 36 dies provided for under state and federal law, including by instituting 37 proceedings in the supreme court of the district where such facility is 38 situated, which is hereby authorized and empowered to enforce the 39 provisions of this section. 40 3. Duty to cooperate. Pursuant to sections 8-406, 8-415, and 17-208 of 41 the election law, the superintendent of each local correctional facility 42 shall cooperate with the board of elections in developing and implement- 43 ing a plan to facilitate at least one method of voter access for all 44 persons eligible to vote who are incarcerated at each such facility, 45 including, but not limited to providing timely clearance, access, and 46 security for board of elections personnel and resources, and making 47 available to such board space and reasonable accommodations within such 48 facility for the discharge of its duties. The department shall issue 49 regulations directing each such facility to ensure the timely delivery, 50 and to facilitate the timely return if applicable, of all official 51 election mail, forms, notices or communications to any incarcerated 52 individual at such facility and that non-partisan plain language educa- 53 tional materials about the voting rights of individuals currently incar- 54 cerated and formerly incarcerated are included in the incarcerated indi- 55 vidual handbook or similar materials and reentry resources. Without 56 limiting any rights or remedies provided to voters under the law, there A. 2121--A 8 1 shall be a presumption of a violation of subdivision one of section 2 17-212 of the election law when any superintendent, employee, or agent 3 of such local correctional facility, by commission or omission, inten- 4 tionally frustrates the purposes of this section. This subdivision shall 5 not apply to any facility where the persons incarcerated at such facili- 6 ty are exclusively under the age of eighteen. 7 4. Rights restoration upon release and registration. Prior to the 8 release from a local correctional facility of any person convicted of a 9 felony the chief administrative officer shall notify such person verbal- 10 ly and in writing that [his or her] their voting rights will be restored 11 upon release and provide such person with a form of application for 12 voter registration and a declination form, offer such person assistance 13 in filling out the appropriate form, and provide such person written 14 information distributed by the board of elections on the importance and 15 the mechanics of voting. Upon release, such person may choose to either 16 submit [his or her] their completed application to the state board or 17 county board where such person resides or have the department transmit 18 it on [his or her] their behalf. Where such person chooses to have the 19 department transmit the application, the chief administrative officer 20 shall transmit the completed application upon such person's release to 21 the state board or county board where such person resides. 22 [2.] 5. Upon discharge or release from the custody of a local correc- 23 tional facility, the chief administrative officer of such facility 24 shall, in consultation with the county board of elections, distribute to 25 every person eighteen years of age or older a written notice on the 26 voting rights of such person in the state of New York, including infor- 27 mation on the importance and mechanics of voting, when such person is or 28 may become eligible to vote, and offer to every such person a voter 29 registration form; provided that, if an individual declines to accept a 30 voter registration form, the chief administrative officer shall maintain 31 a written record of such declination. Notice is not required for those 32 individuals being transferred to a different local correctional facili- 33 ty, individuals being transferred or released to the custody of a state 34 correctional facility or institution, or individuals being released to 35 the custody of a hospital or mental health institution for treatment. 36 § 7. Subdivision 9 of section 1057-a of the New York city charter, as 37 amended by chapter 481 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 38 follows: 39 9. In addition to the other requirements of this section, the depart- 40 ment of correction shall [implement and administer a program of distrib- 41 ution and submission of early mail and absentee ballot applications, and 42 subsequently received early mail or absentee ballots, for eligible 43 incarcerated individuals. Such department shall offer, to all incarcer- 44 ated individuals who are registered to vote, early mail and absentee 45 ballot applications, and a means to complete them, during the period 46 from sixty days prior to any primary, special, or general election in 47 the city of New York until two weeks prior to any such election. Such 48 department shall subsequently provide any early mail or absentee ballot 49 received from the board of elections in response to any such application 50 to the applicable incarcerated individual, as well as a means to 51 complete it. Such department shall provide assistance to any such incar- 52 cerated individual in filling out such application or ballot upon 53 request. Such department shall, not later than five days after receipt, 54 transmit such completed applications and ballots from any incarcerated 55 individual who wishes to have them transmitted to the board of elections 56 for the city of New York. The provisions of this subdivision shall not A. 2121--A 9 1 apply in any specific instance in which the department deems it unsafe 2 to comply therewith] assist, coordinate, and cooperate with the board of 3 elections in developing and implementing a plan to facilitate voter 4 access for all persons eligible to vote who are incarcerated at each 5 facility, in accordance with the democracy during detention act. 6 § 8. Subparagraph (a) of paragraph 4 of subdivision a of section 3202 7 of the New York city charter, as added by section 2 of question 2 of 8 local law number 211 of the city of New York for the year 2018, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 (a) Subject to appropriation and after consultation with the mayor's 11 office of immigrant affairs and the department of city planning, estab- 12 lish a program for providing language interpreters at poll sites 13 throughout New York city for the purpose of facilitating participation 14 by limited English proficient individuals in voting in elections held in 15 the city, which shall include correctional facilities and local correc- 16 tional facilities located in the city. To the extent practicable, the 17 commission shall consult and coordinate with the board of elections of 18 the city of New York in the development and implementation of the 19 program established pursuant to this paragraph. 20 § 9. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 21 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 22 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 23 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 24 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.